Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB224.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2003-H(a) and (d) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2003-H. Comparison tool.(a) Duty of department.--[If the United States Department of Education discontinues the publication of the College Navigator website, the] The department shall make available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a search tool that allows an individual to compare institutions of higher education that meet certain criteria selected by the individual, 12345678910111213141516171819 including the offering of a particular major or program of study.(b) Requirements.--The comparison tool required under this section must:* * *(4.1) Allow a user to identify and compare high priority occupations in this Commonwealth. The information under this paragraph shall be searchable by county and include information on educational attainment, wages and employment demand.* * *(d) Duty of institutions.--[If the department is required to develop the comparison tool under subsection (a), each] Each institution of higher education shall provide the information listed in this section, as available, to the department not later than January 1 of each year. If the information required under this subsection is available in an institution of higher education's Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System report, the institution of higher education may comply with the reporting requirements of this subsection by sending an electronic copy of the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System report to the department. The department shall update the comparison tool as soon as practicable after receiving information from each institution of higher education.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0224PN0177 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526